lexicon/determiner.lexc
Multichar_Symbols ⟪c⟫ ⟪p⟫ ⟪t⟫ ⟪k⟫ ⟪g⟫ ⟪K⟫ ⟪D⟫ ⟪C⟫
                  ⟪def⟫ ⟪indef⟫ ⟪neg⟫ ⟪ques⟫

LEXICON Root
bir⟪indef⟫                 #;
hiçbir⟪indef⟫              #;
o⟪def⟫                     #;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

aynı⟪def⟫                                       #;
beri⟪def⟫                                       #;
beriki⟪def⟫                                     #;
bu⟪def⟫                                         #;
bütün⟪def⟫                                      #;
diğer⟪def⟫                                      #;
her⟪def⟫                                        #;
her% bir⟪def⟫                                   #;
herbir⟪def⟫                                     #;
iki⟪def⟫                                        #;
o⟪def⟫                                          #;
tek⟪def⟫                                        #;
tüm⟪def⟫                                        #;
öbür⟪def⟫                                       #;
öte⟪def⟫                                        #;
öteki⟪def⟫                                      #;
şu⟪def⟫                                         #;
az⟪indef⟫                                       #;
başka⟪indef⟫                                    #;
bir⟪indef⟫                                      #;
bir% bölüm⟪indef⟫                               #;
bir% kesim⟪indef⟫                               #;
bir% kısım⟪indef⟫                               #;
bir% miktar⟪indef⟫                              #;
birkaç⟪indef⟫                                   #;
birkaç% tane⟪indef⟫                             #;
birtakım⟪indef⟫                                 #;
birço⟪k⟫⟪indef⟫                                 #;
bu% kadar⟪indef⟫                                #;
böyle⟪indef⟫                                    #;
böyle% bir⟪indef⟫                               #;
böylesi⟪indef⟫                                  #;
böylesine⟪indef⟫                                #;
bˈazı⟪indef⟫                                    #;
bˈiraz⟪indef⟫                                   #;
bˈunca⟪indef⟫                                   #;
fazla⟪indef⟫                                    #;
herhangi⟪indef⟫                                 #;
herhangi% bir⟪indef⟫                            #;
kimi⟪indef⟫                                     #;
ne% kadar⟪indef⟫                                #;
o% kadar⟪indef⟫                                 #;
okadar⟪indef⟫                                   #;
pek% ço⟪k⟫⟪indef⟫                               #;
pekço⟪k⟫⟪indef⟫                                 #;
çoğu⟪indef⟫                                     #;
ço⟪k⟫⟪indef⟫                                    #;
öyle⟪indef⟫                                     #;
öyle% bir⟪indef⟫                                #;
şu% kadar⟪indef⟫                                #;
şöyle⟪indef⟫                                    #;
şöyle% bir⟪indef⟫                               #;
hiç% bir⟪indef⟫⟪neg⟫                            #;
hiçbir⟪indef⟫⟪neg⟫                              #;
ne% kadar⟪indef⟫⟪ques⟫                          #;
hangi⟪def⟫⟪ques⟫                                #;
falan⟪indef⟫                                    #;
felan⟪indef⟫                                    #;
